Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-906
Technology-related product or service; certain contracts prohibited.

No public entity shall enter into any contract or contract renewal that would result in any state or local government funds being transferred:

(1) To a scrutinized company in connection with any technology-related product or service; or

(2) To any company in connection with any technology-related product or service that originates with a scrutinized company.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB644, § 29.